Utah statutes.
10-7-31.   Sale of property to satisfy claims for special taxes.

The city treasurer shall have the power and authority to seize any personal property belonging to any such company for the satisfaction of any such special taxes when delinquent, and to sell the same upon advertisement and in the same manner as constables are now or may be authorized to sell personal property upon execution; but failure so to do shall in no wise affect or impair the lien of the tax or any proceeding allowed by law for the enforcement thereof. The railroad track or any other property upon which such special taxes shall be levied, or so much thereof as may be necessary, may be sold for the payment of such special taxes in the same manner and with the same effect as real estate upon which special taxes are levied may be sold.



No Change Since 1953

